Utah statutes.
70A-2-601.   Buyer's rights on improper delivery.

Subject to the provisions of this chapter on breach in installment contracts (Section 70A-2-612) and unless otherwise agreed under the sections on contractual limitations of remedy (Sections 70A-2-718 and 70A-2-719), if the goods or the tender of delivery fail in any respect to conform to the contract, the buyer may

(a)  reject the whole; or

(b)  accept the whole; or

(c)  accept any commercial unit or units and reject the rest.

